Washington statutes.
RCW 12.40.025

Transfer of action to small claims department.

A defendant in a district court proceeding in which the claim is within the jurisdictional amount for the small claims department may in accordance with court rules transfer the action to the small claims department. In the event of such a transfer the provisions of RCW 12.40.070 shall not be applicable if the plaintiff was an assignee of the claim at the time the action was commenced nor shall the provisions of RCW 12.40.080 prohibit an attorney from representing the plaintiff if he or she was the attorney of record for the plaintiff at the time the action was commenced.

[ 2010 c 8 s 3038; 1984 c 258 s 59; 1970 ex.s. c 83 s 2.]

NOTES:

Court Improvement Act of 1984—Effective dates—Severability—Short title—1984 c 258: See notes following RCW 3.30.010.